Idaho, session 2025, H0106.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 22-202A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 2, Title 22, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 22-202A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
22-202A. ADVISORY FAIR BOARDS. (1) Any fair board that serves as an ad-
visory body to the board of county commissioners may remain an advisory body
to the board of county commissioners or may petition to be a separate board
that operates pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The petition shall contain the signatures of a majority of the advi-
sory fair board members and shall be submitted in writing to the clerk of the
board of county commissioners.
(3) Upon receipt of the petition, the board of county commissioners
shall immediately cause the clerk to publish a notice in a newspaper of gen-
eral circulation printed within the county for at least two (2) weeks, to the
effect that a petition to remove the fair board from its advisory capacity
and to allow the fair board to conduct a county fair in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter was received and that a hearing on the petition
will be held by the board of county commissioners on a date named in such
notice not less than three (3) and not more than six (6) weeks from the date of
the first publication of such notice.
(4) The fair board shall be removed from its advisory capacity and be
subject to the provisions of this chapter upon a majority vote of the board
of county commissioners and a three-quarters (3/4) majority vote of the fair
board members.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.